Missouri, session 2026, SB1282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 10, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 10.265, to read as
follows:
10.265. The song "Missouri", written by Musician 1st
Class Kenny Ray Horton, is selected for, and shall be known
as, the official state promotional song for the state of
Missouri.
✓